Illinois, session 104th, SB2083.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Property Tax Code is amended by changing 5Section 21-305 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 200/21-305)7    Sec. 21-305. Payments from Indemnity Fund. 8    (a) Any owner of property sold under any provision of this 9Code who sustains loss or damage by reason of the issuance of a 10tax deed under Section 21-445 or 22-40 and who is barred or is 11in any way precluded from bringing an action for the recovery 12of the property shall have the right to indemnity for the loss 13or damage sustained, limited as follows: 14        (1) An owner who resided on property that contained 4 15    or less dwelling units on the last day of the period of 16    redemption and who is equitably entitled to compensation 17    for the loss or damage sustained has the right to 18    indemnity. An equitable indemnity award shall be limited 19    to the fair cash value of the property as of the date the 20    tax deed was issued less any mortgages or liens on the 21    property, and the award will not exceed $99,000. The Court 22    shall liberally construe this equitable entitlement 23    standard to provide compensation wherever, in the   SB2083- 2 -LRB104 03814 HLH 13838 b1    discretion of the Court, the equities warrant the action. 2        An owner of a property that contained 4 or less 3    dwelling units who requests an award in excess of $99,000 4    must prove that the loss of his or her property was not 5    attributable to his or her own fault or negligence before 6    an award in excess of $99,000 will be granted. 7        (2) (Blank). An owner who sustains the loss or damage 8    of any property occasioned by reason of the issuance of a 9    tax deed, without fault or negligence of his or her own, 10    has the right to indemnity limited to the fair cash value 11    of the property less any mortgages or liens on the 12    property. In determining the existence of fault or 13    negligence, the court shall consider whether the owner 14    exercised ordinary reasonable diligence under all of the 15    relevant circumstances. 16        (3) In determining the fair cash value of property 17    less any mortgages or liens on the property, the fair cash 18    value shall be reduced by the principal amount of all 19    taxes paid by the tax purchaser or his or her assignee 20    before the issuance of the tax deed. 21        (4) If an award made under this Section paragraph (1) 22    or (2) is subject to a reduction by the amount of an 23    outstanding mortgage or lien on the property, other than 24    the principal amount of all taxes paid by the tax 25    purchaser or his or her assignee before the issuance of 26    the tax deed and the petitioner would be personally liable   SB2083- 3 -LRB104 03814 HLH 13838 b1    to the mortgagee or lienholder for all or part of that 2    reduction amount, the court shall order an additional 3    indemnity award to be paid directly to the mortgagee or 4    lienholder sufficient to discharge the petitioner's 5    personal liability. The court, in its discretion, may 6    order the joinder of the mortgagee or lienholder as an 7    additional party to the indemnity action.8    (b) Indemnity fund; subrogation. 9        (1) Any person claiming indemnity hereunder shall 10    petition the Court which ordered the tax deed to issue, 11    shall name the County Treasurer, as Trustee of the 12    indemnity fund, as defendant to the petition, and shall 13    ask that judgment be entered against the County Treasurer, 14    as Trustee, in the amount of the indemnity sought. The 15    provisions of the Civil Practice Law shall apply to 16    proceedings under the petition, except that neither the 17    petitioner nor County Treasurer shall be entitled to trial 18    by jury on the issues presented in the petition. The Court 19    shall liberally construe this Section to provide 20    compensation wherever in the discretion of the Court the 21    equities warrant such action. 22        (2) The County Treasurer, as Trustee of the indemnity 23    fund, shall be subrogated to all parties in whose favor 24    judgment may be rendered against him or her, and by third 25    party complaint may bring in as a defendant any person, 26    other than the tax deed grantee and its successors in   SB2083- 4 -LRB104 03814 HLH 13838 b1    title, not a party to the action who is or may be liable to 2    him or her, as subrogee, for all or part of the 3    petitioner's claim against him or her.4    (c) Any contract involving the proceeds of a judgment for 5indemnity under this Section, between the tax deed grantee or 6its successors in title and the indemnity petitioner or his or 7her successors, shall be in writing. In any action brought 8under Section 21-305, the Collector shall be entitled to 9discovery regarding, but not limited to, the following: 10        (1) the identity of all persons beneficially 11    interested in the contract, directly or indirectly, 12    including at least the following information: the names 13    and addresses of any natural persons; the place of 14    incorporation of any corporation and the names and 15    addresses of its shareholders unless it is publicly held; 16    the names and addresses of all general and limited 17    partners of any partnership; the names and addresses of 18    all persons having an ownership interest in any entity 19    doing business under an assumed name, and the county in 20    which the assumed business name is registered; and the 21    nature and extent of the interest in the contract of each 22    person identified; 23        (2) the time period during which the contract was 24    negotiated and agreed upon, from the date of the first 25    direct or indirect contact between any of the contracting 26    parties to the date of its execution;   SB2083- 5 -LRB104 03814 HLH 13838 b1        (3) the name and address of each natural person who 2    took part in negotiating the contract, and the identity 3    and relationship of the party that the person represented 4    in the negotiations; and 5        (4) the existence of an agreement for payment of 6    attorney's fees by or on behalf of each party.7    Any information disclosed during discovery may be subject 8to protective order as deemed appropriate by the court. The 9terms of the contract shall not be used as evidence of value.10    (d) A petition of indemnity under this Section must be 11filed within 10 years after the date the tax deed was issued. 12(Source: P.A. 97-557, eff. 7-1-12.) 13    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 14becoming law.